Utah statutes.
41-6a-209.   Obedience to peace officer or other traffic controllers --
Speeding in construction zones.
(1)  A person may not willfully fail or willfully refuse to comply with any
lawful order or direction of a:
(a)  peace officer;
(b)  firefighter;
(c)  flagger at a highway construction or maintenance site using devices and
procedures conforming to the standards adopted under Section 41-6a-301; or
(d)  uniformed adult school crossing guard invested by law with authority to
direct, control, or regulate traffic.
(2) (a) If a person commits a speeding violation in a highway construction or
maintenance site where workers are present, the court shall impose a fine for
the offense that is at least double the fine in the uniform recommended fine
schedule established under Section 76-3-301.5.
(b)  The highway construction or maintenance site under Subsection (2)(a)
shall be clearly marked and have signs posted that warn of the doubled fine.
